Utah statutes.
26-8a-105.   Department powers.

The department shall:

(1)  coordinate the emergency medical services within the state;

(2)  administer this chapter and the rules established pursuant to it;

(3)  establish a voluntary task force representing a diversity of emergency medical service providers to advise the department and the committee on rules; and

(4)  adopt rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to:

(a)  license ambulance providers and paramedic providers;

(b)  permit ambulances and emergency medical response vehicles, including approving an emergency vehicle operator's course in accordance with Section 26-8a-304;

(c)  establish application, submission, and procedural requirements for licenses, designations, certificates, and permits; and

(d)  establish and implement the programs, plans, and responsibilities as specified in other sections of this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 350, 2013 General Session

